Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 2 PLANNING COMMISSION
31-23-220. Reservation for future acquisition.

Any commission is empowered, from time to time, after it has adopted a major street plan of the territory within its subdivision jurisdiction or of any major section or district thereof, to make or cause to be made surveys for the exact location of the lines of a street in any portion of such territory and to make a plat of the area or district thus surveyed showing the land which it recommends be reserved for future acquisition for public streets. The commission, before adopting any such plat, shall hold a public hearing thereon, notice of the time and place of which, with a general description of the district or area covered by the plat, shall be given not less than ten days previous to the time fixed therefor by one publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality if the district or area is within the municipality or of general circulation in the county if the district or area is outside the municipality. After such a hearing the commission may transmit the plat, as originally made or modified, as may be determined by the commission, to the governing body together with the commission's estimate of the time within which the lands shown on the plat as street locations should be acquired by the municipality.

The governing body, by resolution, may approve and adopt or reject such plat or may modify it with the approval of the planning commission or, in the event of the commission's disapproval, the governing body, by a favorable vote of not less than two-thirds of its entire membership, may modify such plat and adopt the modified plat. In the resolution of adoption of a plat, the governing body shall fix the period of time for which the street locations shown upon the plat shall be reserved for future taking or acquisition for public use. Upon such adoption the clerk shall transmit one attested copy of the plat to the county clerk and recorder of each county in which the platted land is located and retain one copy for the purpose of public examination and hearings of claims for compensation.

Such approval and adoption of a plat shall not, however, be deemed the opening or establishment of any street, nor the taking of any land for street purposes, nor for public use, nor as a public improvement but solely as a reservation of the street location shown therein for the period specified in the resolution for future taking or acquisition for public use. The commission at any time may negotiate for and secure from the owners of any such lands releases of claims for damages or compensation for such reservations or agreements indemnifying the municipality from such claims by others, which releases or agreements shall be binding upon the owners executing the same and their successors in title.

At any time after the filing of a plat with the county clerk and recorder and during the period specified for the reservation, the commission and the owner of any land containing a reserved street location may agree upon modification of the location of the lines of the proposed street. Such agreement shall include a release by said owner of any claim for compensation or damages by reason of such modification. Thereupon the commission may make a plat corresponding to the said modification and transmit the same to the governing body. If such modified plat is approved by the governing body, the clerk shall transmit an attested copy thereof to the county clerk and recorder and the modified plat shall take the place of the original plat. At any time the governing body, by resolution, may abandon any reservation and shall certify any such abandonment to the county clerk and recorder.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1152, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-23-120 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-23-221. Compensation for reservations.

In the resolution of adoption of a plat, the governing body shall appoint a board of three appraisers and shall fix the time and place of meetings for hearings by said board upon the amounts of compensation to be paid for such reservations. Thereupon the clerk shall publish in at least two newspapers of general circulation in the municipality once a week for four consecutive weeks a notice which shall contain a general description of the land thus reserved as shown on the plat, the provisions of the resolution of the governing body, including the period of time for which such reservations are made, the time within which claims for compensation may be filed, which shall be not less than three nor more than six months from the date of notice, and the time and place of hearings by the board of appraisers. The first hearing shall not be set earlier than thirty days after the date of the first of such publications. Such notice shall also be posted in at least three public places in the neighborhood of or along the line of the location of the reservation.

The board of appraisers shall fix the amounts of compensation to be paid, respectively, to the owners of lands reserved for the period of time as shown on the plat and in the resolution adopted by the governing body. When the clerk receives, within the period fixed for the same, any claim for such compensation, he shall transmit it to the board of appraisers. At the time and place fixed for such hearings, the board of appraisers shall hear and consider all claims presented to it in writing or in person, including all evidence which may be presented by the claimants or other persons. The board of appraisers has the right on its own initiative to investigate and ascertain data or evidence relevant to the question of such compensation. In case of the abandonment of a reservation prior to the time fixed for payment of compensation, the municipality shall be liable to the owner of the land included within the abandoned reservation for the expenses, if any, incurred by such owner by reason of such reservation.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1152, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-23-121 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-23-222. Report of appraisers - action by the governing body.

The board of appraisers, within ninety days after the time fixed for the filing of claims, shall file its tentative report with the clerk setting forth its findings as to the amounts of compensation to be paid the respective owners of the lands included within the lines of such reservations as located on the approved plat. Thereupon the clerk shall publish once a week for two consecutive weeks in at least two newspapers of general circulation in the municipality the fact of the filing of the report of the appraisers and specify a period of thirty days after the date of the first such publication within which objections to the report may be filed with the clerk. If objections are filed within said period, the clerk shall cause the board of appraisers to hold a meeting at which said objections shall be transmitted to the board, and the board may modify its report. The report in its original form or, if modified, in its modified form shall be transmitted to the governing body by the clerk.

Before passing on the report, the governing body may return it to the board of appraisers for reconsideration, and the board, upon further consideration, may transmit its former or modified report to the governing body. The governing body may approve or disapprove the report. If the report is approved by the governing body, it shall provide for the payment of the amounts of compensation set forth in the report within ninety days after the filing of the report with the governing body. In the case of those property owners who file claims, payment shall be made through the clerk who shall notify the claimants at the addresses given upon the claims filed with him. Payments to all other persons shall be made through the clerk of the district court of the county in which the reserved location is situated by the payment to said clerk of the amounts awarded to such persons. Notice of distribution to such persons shall be given and made as may be provided by a rule or order of said court. Payments made to the clerk or clerk of the district court within said ninety days shall be deemed compliance with the above requirement for payment within ninety days.

If the governing body disapproves the report or fails to provide for such payment within ninety days, such disapproval or failure shall be deemed a dismissal of the proceedings, a cancellation of the plat, and an abandonment of the reservations of the street locations as shown on the plat, with the same liability of the municipality for expenses as provided in the case of abandonment by resolution. Thereafter the clerk shall transmit to the county clerk and recorder an attested statement of such abandonment.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1152, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-23-122 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-23-223. Appeal from awards.

Within twenty days after the approval of any such report by the governing body, any person dissatisfied with the award of compensation may file with the clerk notice of appeal to the district court of the county in which the appellant's land is located. Within ten days of such notice, the clerk shall file with the clerk of the district court the report of the board of appraisers approved by the governing body, together with certified copies of the resolution thereof and of the notice of appeal. Thereafter the procedure shall be in accordance with the procedure specified by law.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1154, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-23-123 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-23-224. No compensation for buildings.

The reservation of a street location, as provided in section 31-23-220, shall not prohibit or impair in any respect the use of the reserved land by the owner or occupant thereof for any lawful purpose, including the erection of buildings thereon. No compensations, other than the compensation awarded in the final report of said board of appraisers as approved by the governing body, as provided in section 31-23-222 or, in the case of an appeal, as awarded on such appeal as provided in section 31-23-223, shall at any time be paid by the municipality or public to or recovered from the municipality or public by any person for the taking of or injury to any building or structure built or erected within the period fixed in the resolution of the governing body upon any such reserved location. No compensation or damages for any such reservation shall be paid or recovered except as provided in sections 31-23-221 to 31-23-223.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1154, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-23-124 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-23-225. Major activity notice.

When a subdivision or commercial or industrial activity is proposed which will cover five or more acres of land, the governing body of the municipality in which the activity is proposed shall send notice to the state geologist and the board of county commissioners of the county in which the improvement is located of the proposal prior to approval of any zoning change, subdivision, or building permit application associated with such a proposed activity.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1154, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 669, § 7, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-23-125 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For duties of the state geologist upon receipt of a notice, see § 23-41-205.

31-23-226. Applicability.

This part 2 applies to municipalities, including home rule cities and towns, insofar as constitutionally permissible and except as limits are placed upon its application within the boundaries of home rule cities and towns by the charter or ordinance adopted pursuant thereto of said cities or towns.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1156, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-23-101 (4) as it existed prior to 1975.

31-23-227. Allocation of powers or duties.

The governing body of a municipality may, by ordinance, assume and exercise any power granted to or duty placed upon the municipal planning commission by this part 2 and may, by ordinance, delegate to the municipal planning commission or other appropriate municipal body any power granted to or duty placed upon the municipal governing body by this part 2, providing that the right to appeal to the municipal governing body is retained in any such delegation; except that the power to impose fines and penalties may not be delegated.

The governing body of a municipality may, by ordinance, enter into an intergovernmental agreement with the county or counties in which it is located for the purposes of joint participation in land use planning, subdivision procedures, and zoning for a specific area designated in the intergovernmental agreement. However, any action taken pursuant to the intergovernmental agreement that pertains to any land within the municipality is subject to final approval by the governing body of the municipality.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire section added, p. 1263, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 575, § 1, effective April 25.